Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [10A.035] LOBBYING RESTRICTION. new text end new text begin A member of the legislature must not act as a lobbyist or register as a lobbyist for a period of two years following the end of the member's legislative service. The board may impose a civil penalty of the lesser of $25,000 or an amount equal to the amount the member earned as a lobbyist in violation of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to legislators who leave legislative service on or after that date. new text end